tests/fut.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tki.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tki.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] future tense {A} A:0" :
  گل<v><iv><fut>: گلر
  گیت<v><iv><fut>: گیدر
  "[twol] future tense {A} A:ا" :
  یات<v><iv><fut>: یاتار
  یاز<v><iv><fut>: یازار
